Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 9A

PRODUCER
LICENSING

Cross References

Bail agents; sureties, see article 9N.

[PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS]

Revision Note

Part I designation added by revisor pursuant to L 2002, c
235, §4.

§431:9A-101 Scope. This article
governs qualifications and procedures for the licensing of insurance
producers. It simplifies and organizes statutory language to improve
efficiency, to permit the use of new technology, and to reduce costs associated
with issuing and renewing insurance licenses. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2; am L
2003, c 212, §55; am L 2006, c 154, §22]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next